src/fst/test/older-gt-norm-yamls/N-IN-astotin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - astotin - ok : # -m inanimate noun, hat
     astotin+N+IN+Sg: astotin
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitastotin
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitastotin
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitastotininân
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitastotininaw
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitastotiniwâw
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otastotin
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otastotiniwâw
     astotin+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otastotiniyiw

     astotin+N+IN+Pl: astotina
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitastotina
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitastotina
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitastotininâna
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitastotininawa
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitastotiniwâwa
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otastotina
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otastotiniwâwa
     astotin+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otastotiniyiwa

     astotin+N+IN+Loc: astotinihk
     astotin+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitastotinihk
     astotin+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitastotinihk
     astotin+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitastotininâhk
     astotin+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitastotininâhk
     astotin+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitastotiniwâhk
     astotin+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otastotinihk
     astotin+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otastotiniwâhk
     astotin+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otastotiniyihk

     astotin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [ascocinis, ascocinisis]
     astotin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [ascocinisa, ascocinisisa]
     astotin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [ascocinisihk, ascocinisisihk]
     astotin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicascocinis, nicascocinisis]
     astotin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicascocinis, kicascocinisis]
     astotin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [ocascocinis, ocascocinisis]
